California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(g) The responsibilities and jurisdiction granted by this section to the entities described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, are subject to the responsibility and jurisdiction granted pursuant to Section 368.5 of the Penal Code. The legislature
 finds and declares that this subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 554, Sec. 17.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

15651.

County adult protective service agencies and the Home Safe Program, as established in Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 15770), may refer individuals with complex or intensive needs to the appropriate state or local agencies, as determined by the adult protective services agency or the Home Safe Program case workers, and based on a determination that the individual may be eligible for services and that those services may support the individual’s safety goals. A referral may be made before or after an individual begins to receive adult protective services, and a referral does not preclude the individual from receiving adult protective services or Home Safe program services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 67.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Interagency Coordination [15653. - 15655.5.]

15653.

(a) Minimum guidelines for use by county adult protective services agencies in determining when an investigation of abuse is warranted shall be maintained by the State Department of Social Services in cooperation with representatives of county government, and in consultation with the Department of Aging, the Department of Justice, and other concerned state departments for use by county adult protective services agencies.

(b) Uniform guidelines for local law enforcement assistance with investigations of allegations of abuse to elders and dependent adults as developed by the Department of Justice in consultation with the department, the Department of Aging, and other concerned state and local agencies pursuant to Section 15640, as amended by Chapter 769 of the Statutes of 1986, shall remain in effect until modified. Consistent with these guidelines, county adult protective services agencies may seek local law enforcement assistance with investigations of allegations of abuse to elder and dependent adults.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15653.5.

Training for determining when to refer for possible criminal prosecution a report of a known or suspected instance of abuse that occurred in a long-term care facility shall be included in the training provided by the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 12528 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 554, Sec. 18.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

15654.

(a) As described in subdivision (h) of Section 12528 of the Government Code, the division shall offer training programs to local law enforcement and prosecutorial personnel in investigating and prosecuting crimes against elders and dependent adults, and to the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Social Services, the county adult protective services agencies and to the long-term care ombudsman program in evaluating and documenting criminal abuse against elders and dependent adults.

(b) When producing new or updated training materials pursuant to this section, the division shall consult with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training and
 other subject matter experts. Any new or updated training materials shall address all of the following:

(1) The jurisdiction and responsibility of law enforcement agencies pursuant to Section 368.5 of the Penal Code.

(2) The fact that the protected classes of “dependent person” as defined in Section 288 of the Penal Code and “dependent adult” as defined in Section 368 of the Penal Code include many persons with disabilities, regardless of the fact that most of those persons live independently.

(3) Other relevant information and laws.

(c) When the division offers or provides new or updated training materials pursuant to this section, the division also may
 inform the agencies of other relevant training materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 554, Sec. 19.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

15655.

(a) (1) Each long-term health care facility, as defined in Section 1418 of the Health and Safety Code, community care facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, or residential care facility for the elderly, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code, that provides care to adults shall provide training in recognizing and reporting elder and dependent adult abuse, as prescribed by the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall, in cooperation with the State Department of Health Services and the State Department of Social Services, develop a minimal core training program for use by these facilities. As part of that training, long-term care facilities, including nursing homes
 and out-of-home care facilities, shall provide to all staff being trained a written copy of the reporting requirements and a written notification of the staff’s confidentiality rights as specified in Section 15633.5.

(2) Each long-term health care facility, as defined in Section 1418 of the Health and Safety Code, and each community care facility as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, shall comply with paragraph (1) by January 1, 2001, or, if the facility began operation after July 31, 2000, within six months of the date of the beginning of the operation of the facility. Employees hired after June 1, 2001, shall be trained within 60 days of their first day of employment.

(3) Each residential care facility, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code, shall comply with paragraph (1) by July 1, 2002, or, if the facility began operation after July 1,
 2002, within six months of the date of the beginning of the operation of the facility. Employees hired on or after July 1, 2002, shall be trained within 60 days of their first day of employment.

(b) Each long-term health care facility, as defined in Section 1418 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be subject to review by the State Department of Health Services Licensing and Certification Unit for compliance with the duties imposed in subdivision (a).

(c) Each community care facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, and residential care facility for the elderly, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be subject to review by the State Department of Social Services Community Care Licensing Unit for compliance with the duties imposed in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 624.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15655.5.

A county adult protective services agency shall provide the organizations listed in subdivisions (v), (w), and (x) of Section 15610.17, and mandated reporters of suspected financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult pursuant to Sections 15630.1 and 15630.2, with instructional materials regarding abuse and neglect of an elder or dependent adult and their obligation to report under this chapter. At a minimum, the instructional materials shall include all of the following:

(a) An explanation of abuse and neglect of an elder or
 dependent adult, as defined in this chapter.

(b) Information on how to recognize potential abuse and neglect of an elder or dependent adult.

(c) Information on how the county adult protective services agency investigates reports of known or suspected abuse and neglect.

(d) Instructions on how to report known or suspected incidents of abuse and neglect, including the appropriate telephone numbers to call and what types of information would assist the county adult protective services agency with its investigation of the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 272, Sec. 5.   (SB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Prosecution of Elder and Dependent Adult Abuse Cases [15656. - 15656.]

15656.

(a) Any person who knows or reasonably should know that a person is an elder or dependent adult and who, under circumstances or conditions likely to produce great bodily harm or death, willfully causes or permits any elder or dependent adult to suffer, or inflicts unjustifiable physical pain or mental suffering upon him or her, or having the care or custody of any elder or dependent adult, willfully causes or permits the person or health of the elder or dependent adult to be injured, or willfully causes or permits the elder or dependent adult to be placed in a situation such that his or her person or health is endangered, is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or in the state prison for two, three, or four years.

(b) Any person who knows or reasonably should know
 that a person is an elder or dependent adult and who, under circumstances or conditions other than those likely to produce great bodily harm or death, willfully causes or permits any elder or dependent adult to suffer, or inflicts unjustifiable physical pain or mental suffering on him or her, or having the care or custody of any elder or dependent adult, willfully causes or permits the person or health of the elder or dependent adult to be injured or willfully causes or permits the elder or dependent adult to be placed in a situation such that his or her person or health may be endangered, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Any caretaker of an elder or a dependent adult who violates any provision of law prescribing theft or embezzlement, with respect to the property of that elder or dependent adult, is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or in the state prison for two, three, or four years when the money, labor, or real or personal property taken is
 of a value exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), and by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that imprisonment and fine, when the money, labor, or real or personal property taken is of a value not exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950).

(d) As used in this section, “caretaker” means any person who has the care, custody, or control of or who stands in a position of trust with, an elder or a dependent adult.

(e) Conduct
 covered in subdivision (b) of Section 15610.57 shall not be subject to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 57.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Civil Actions for Abuse of Elderly or Dependent Adults [15657. - 15657.8.]

15657.

If it is proven by clear and convincing evidence, or by a preponderance of the evidence pursuant to Section 15657.02, that a defendant is liable for physical abuse as defined in Section 15610.63, neglect as defined in Section 15610.57, or abandonment as defined in Section 15610.05, and that the defendant has been guilty of recklessness, oppression, fraud, or malice in the commission of this abuse, the following shall apply, in addition to all other remedies otherwise provided by law:

(a) The court shall award to the plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. The term “costs” includes, but is not limited to, reasonable fees for the services of a conservator, if any, devoted to the litigation of a claim
 brought under this article.

(b) The limitations imposed by Section 377.34 of the Code of Civil Procedure on the damages recoverable shall not apply. However, the damages recovered shall not exceed the damages permitted to be recovered pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3333.2 of the Civil Code.

(c) The standards set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 3294 of the Civil Code regarding the imposition of punitive damages on an employer based upon the acts of an employee shall be satisfied before any damages or attorney’s fees permitted under this section may be imposed against an employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   (AB 251)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.01.

Notwithstanding Section 483.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure, an attachment may be issued in any action for damages pursuant to Section 15657.5 for financial abuse of an elder or dependent adult, as defined in Section 15610.30. The other provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure not inconsistent with this article shall govern the issuance of an attachment pursuant to this section. In an application for a writ of attachment, the claimant shall refer to this section. An attachment may be issued pursuant to this section whether or not other forms of relief are
 demanded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 45, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.02.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the court may determine the standard of evidence in any claim for remedies sought under Section 15657 to be a preponderance of the evidence under either of the following circumstances:

(A) The plaintiff prevails on a discovery motion pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2023.030 of the Code of Civil Procedure due to spoliation of evidence by the defendant.

(B) A judge or arbitrator determines at any point during litigation or arbitration that spoliation of evidence has been committed by the defendant.

(2) The court shall issue its findings under this subdivision in writing.

(b) (1) This section applies only to claims brought against a residential care facility licensed pursuant to the California Residential Care Facilities for the Elderly Act (Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 1569) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), an adult community care facility licensed pursuant to the California Community Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), or a skilled nursing facility as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2).

(2) This section does not apply to either of the following:

(A) A facility owned or operated by a general acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) of, an acute psychiatric hospital, as defined in subdivision (b) of, or a special hospital, as defined in subdivision (f) of, Section 1250 of, and licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of, the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A facility that holds a valid license issued pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 1254 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “spoliation of evidence” means the intentional improper alteration of evidence or the intentional concealment or
 destruction of records, documents, or other evidence that is done by a party, with the intent of preventing the evidence from being produced, and that has materially prejudiced the other party.

(2) In determining whether spoliation of evidence has occurred, a judge shall consider whether records, documents, or other evidence is intentionally destroyed in any of the following manners:

(A) Prior to the expiration of a legally required time period for holding the records, documents, or other evidence.

(B) In contravention of the party’s written records retention policy.

(C) After receipt of a written directive to preserve relevant records, documents, or other
 evidence.

(d) For purposes of this section, the records, documents, or other evidence that is the subject of the spoliation shall be material to the claim brought under this article and specifically required to be maintained or preserved by the
 defendant.

(e) This section does not modify the standard of evidence for cases brought under Section 15657.03.

(f) The remedy provided in this section is cumulative with any other remedy available by law.

(g) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that facilities described in subdivision (b) have an existing duty to refrain from committing spoliation of evidence in actions brought pursuant to Section 15657 and, therefore, this section does not impose a new requirement on those facilities that is reimbursable pursuant to Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 14126), any other law or regulation governing Medi-Cal ratesetting, or the California Medicaid State Plan.

(h) If there is a final judicial determination in any action by any party, or a final determination by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, that the state is required by state or federal law or regulation to provide reimbursement under the Medi-Cal program to the health care facilities described in subdivision (b) for costs associated with this section, and the Legislature does not appropriate sufficient funds to pay for those costs, this section shall become inoperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 433, Sec. 2.   (AB 251)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15657.03.

(a) (1) An elder or dependent adult who has suffered abuse, as defined in Section 15610.07, may seek protective orders as provided in this section.

(2) (A) A petition may be brought on behalf of an abused elder or dependent adult by a conservator or a trustee of the elder or dependent adult, an attorney-in-fact of an elder or dependent adult who acts within the authority of a power of attorney, a person appointed as a guardian ad litem for the elder or dependent adult, or other person legally authorized to seek the relief.

(B) (i) Subject to clause (ii), if the
 petition alleges abuse of an elder or dependent adult in the form of isolation, the term “other person legally authorized to seek the relief” as used in subparagraph (A) includes an interested party as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(ii) Clause (i) shall apply only for the purpose of seeking an order enjoining isolation under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).

(3) (A) A petition under this section may be brought on behalf of an elder or dependent adult by a county adult protective services agency in either of the following circumstances:

(i) If the elder or dependent adult has suffered abuse as defined in subdivision (b) and has an impaired ability to appreciate
 and understand the circumstances that place the elder or dependent at risk of harm.

(ii) If the elder or dependent adult has provided written authorization to a county adult protective services agency to act on that person’s behalf.

(B) In the case of a petition filed pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) by a county adult protective services agency, a referral shall be made to the public guardian consistent with Section 2920 of the Probate Code prior to or concurrent with the filing of the petition, unless a petition for appointment of a conservator has already been filed with the probate court by the public guardian or another party.

(C) A county adult protective services agency shall be subject to any
 confidentiality restrictions that otherwise apply to its activities under law and shall disclose only those facts as necessary to establish reasonable cause for the filing of the petition, including, in the case of a petition filed pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A), to establish the agency’s belief that the elder or dependent adult has suffered abuse and has an impaired ability to appreciate and understand the circumstances that place the elder or dependent adult at risk, and as may be requested by the court in determining whether to issue an order under this section.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Abuse” has the meaning set forth in Section 15610.07.

(2) “Conservator” means the legally appointed conservator of the
 person or estate of the petitioner, or both.

(3) “Interested party” means an individual with a personal, preexisting relationship with the elder or dependent adult. A preexisting relationship may be shown by a description of past involvement with the elder or dependent adult, time spent together,
 and any other proof that the individual spent time with the elder or dependent adult.

(4) “Petitioner” means the elder or dependent adult to be protected by the protective orders and, if the court grants the petition, the protected person.

(5) “Protective order” means an order that includes any of the following restraining orders, whether issued ex parte, after notice and hearing, or in a judgment:

(A) An order enjoining a party from abusing, intimidating, molesting, attacking, striking, stalking, threatening, sexually assaulting, battering, harassing, telephoning, including, but not limited to, making annoying telephone calls as described in Section 653m of the Penal Code, destroying personal
 property, contacting, either directly or indirectly, by mail or otherwise, or coming within a specified distance of, or disturbing the peace of, the petitioner, and, in the discretion of the court, on a showing of good cause, of other named family or household members or a conservator, if any, of the petitioner. On a showing of good cause, in an order issued pursuant to this subparagraph in connection with an animal owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by the petitioner, or residing in the residence or household of the petitioner, the court may do either or both of the following:

(i) Grant the petitioner exclusive care, possession, or control of the animal.

(ii) Order the respondent to stay away from the animal and refrain from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, molesting,
 attacking, striking, threatening, harming, or otherwise disposing of the animal.

(B) An order excluding a party from the petitioner’s residence or dwelling, except that this order shall not be issued if legal or equitable title to, or lease of, the residence or dwelling is in the sole name of the party to be excluded, or is in the name of the party to be excluded and any other party besides the petitioner.

(C) An order enjoining a party from specified behavior that the court determines is necessary to effectuate orders described in subparagraph (A) or (B).

(D) (i) After notice and a hearing only, a finding that specific debts were incurred as the result of financial abuse of the elder or dependent
 adult by the respondent. For purposes of this subparagraph, the acts that may support this order include, but are not limited to, the crimes proscribed by Section 530.5 of the Penal Code.

(ii) The finding pursuant to clause (i) shall not entitle the petitioner to any remedies other than those actually set forth in this section. The finding pursuant to clause (i) shall not affect the priority of any lien or other security interest.

(E) (i) After notice and a hearing only, an order enjoining a party from abusing an elder or dependent adult by isolating them. An order may be issued under this subparagraph to restrain the respondent for the purpose of preventing a recurrence of isolation if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence, to the satisfaction
 of the court, that the following requirements are met:

(I) The respondent’s past act or acts of isolation of the elder or dependent adult repeatedly prevented contact with the interested party.

(II) The elder or dependent adult expressly desires contact with the interested party. A court shall use all means at its disposal to determine whether the elder or dependent adult desires contact with the person and has the capacity to consent to that contact.

(III) The respondent’s isolation of the elder or dependent adult from the interested party was not in response to an actual or threatened abuse of the elder or dependent adult by the interested party or the elder or dependent adult’s desire not to have contact with the interested
 party.

(ii) The order may specify the actions to be enjoined, including enjoining the respondent from preventing the interested party from in-person or remote online visits with the elder or dependent adult, including telephone and online contact.

(iii) An order enjoining isolation under this section is not required for an elder or dependent adult to visit with anyone with whom the elder or dependent adult desires visitation.

(iv) An order enjoining isolation shall not be issued under this section if the elder or dependent adult resides in a long-term care facility, as defined in Section 9701, or a residential facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code. In those cases, action may be taken under
 appropriate federal law.

(v) An order enjoining isolation shall not be issued under this section if the elder or dependent adult is a patient of a health facility as defined in subdivision (a), (b), or (f) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code. In those cases, action may be taken under other appropriate state or federal law.

(6) “Respondent” means the person against whom the protective orders are sought and, if the petition is granted, the restrained or
 enjoined person.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an order may be issued under this section, with or without notice, to restrain any person for the purpose of preventing a recurrence of abuse, if a declaration shows, to the satisfaction of the court, reasonable proof of a past act or acts of abuse of the petitioning elder or dependent adult. 

(d) Upon filing a petition for protective orders under this section, the petitioner may obtain a temporary restraining order in accordance with Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except to the extent this section provides a rule that is inconsistent. The temporary restraining order may include any of the protective orders described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b). However, the court may issue an ex parte
 order excluding a party from the petitioner’s residence or dwelling only on a showing of all of the following:

(1) Facts sufficient for the court to ascertain that the party who will stay in the dwelling has a right under color of law to possession of the premises.

(2) That the party to be excluded has assaulted or threatens to assault the petitioner, other named family or household member of the petitioner, or a conservator of the petitioner.

(3) That physical or emotional harm would otherwise result to the petitioner, other named family or household member of the petitioner, or a conservator of the petitioner.

(e) A request for the issuance of a temporary
 restraining order without notice under this section shall be granted or denied on the same day that the petition is submitted to the court, unless the petition is filed too late in the day to permit effective review, in which case the order shall be granted or denied on the next day of judicial business in sufficient time for the order to be filed that day with the clerk of the court.

(f) Within 21 days, or, if good cause appears to the court, 25 days, from the date that a request for a temporary restraining order is granted or denied, a hearing shall be held on the petition. If no request for temporary orders is made, the hearing shall be held within 21 days, or, if good cause appears to the court, 25 days, from the date that the petition is filed.

(g) The respondent may file a
 response that explains or denies the alleged abuse.

(h) The court may issue, upon notice and a hearing, any of the orders set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b). The court may issue, after notice and hearing, an order excluding a person from a residence or dwelling if the court finds that physical or emotional harm would otherwise result to the petitioner, other named family or household member of the petitioner, or conservator of the petitioner.

(i) (1) In the discretion of the court, an order issued after notice and a hearing under this section may have a duration of not more than five years, subject to termination or modification by further order of the court either on written stipulation filed with the court or on the motion of a party. These
 orders may be renewed upon the request of a party, either for five years or permanently, without a showing of any further abuse since the issuance of the original order, subject to termination or modification by further order of the court either on written stipulation filed with the court or on the motion of a party. The request for renewal may be brought at any time within the three months before the expiration of the order.

(2) The failure to state the expiration date on the face of the form creates an order with a duration of three years from the date of issuance.

(3) If an action is filed for the purpose of terminating or modifying a protective order prior to the expiration date specified in the order by a party other than the protected party, the party who is protected by the
 order shall be given notice, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1005 of the Code of Civil Procedure, of the proceeding by personal service or, if the protected party has satisfied the requirements of Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, by service on the Secretary of State. If the party who is protected by the order cannot be notified prior to the hearing for modification or termination of the protective order, the court shall deny the motion to modify or terminate the order without prejudice or continue the hearing until the party who is protected can be properly noticed and may, upon a showing of good cause, specify another method for service of process that is reasonably designed to afford actual notice to the protected party. The protected party may waive the right to notice if that party is physically present in court and does not
 challenge the sufficiency of the notice.

(j) In a proceeding under this section, a support person may accompany a party in court and, if the party is not represented by an attorney, may sit with the party at the table that is generally reserved for the party and the party’s attorney. The support person is present to provide moral and emotional support for a person who alleges to be a victim of abuse. The support person is not present as a legal adviser and may not provide legal advice. The support person may assist the person who alleges to be a victim of abuse in feeling more confident that the alleged abuse victim will not be injured or threatened by the other party during the proceedings if the person who alleges to be a victim of abuse and the other party are required to be present in close proximity. This subdivision does not preclude
 the court from exercising its discretion to remove the support person from the courtroom if the court believes the support person is prompting, swaying, or influencing the party assisted by the support person.

(k) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), upon the filing of a petition for protective orders under this section, the respondent shall be personally served with a copy of the petition, notice of the hearing or order to show cause, temporary restraining order, if any, and any declarations in support of the petition. Service shall be made at least five days before the hearing. The court may, on motion of the petitioner or on its own motion, shorten the time for service on the respondent.

(2) Commencing
 January 1, 2027, if the court determines at the hearing that, after a diligent effort, the petitioner has been unable to accomplish personal service, and that there is reason to believe that the respondent is evading service or cannot be located, then the court may specify another method of service that is reasonably calculated to give actual notice to the respondent and may prescribe the manner in which proof of service shall be made. 

(l) A notice of hearing under this section shall notify the respondent that if the respondent does not attend the hearing, the court may make orders against the respondent that could last up to five years. 

(m) The respondent shall be entitled, as a matter of course, to one continuance, for a reasonable period, to respond to the
 petition.

(n) (1) Either party may request a continuance of the hearing, which the court shall grant on a showing of good cause. The request may be made in writing before or at the hearing or orally at the hearing. The court may also grant a continuance on its own motion.

(2) If the court grants a continuance, any temporary restraining order that has been granted shall remain in effect until the end of the continued hearing, unless otherwise ordered by the court. In granting a continuance, the court may modify or terminate a temporary restraining order.

(o) (1) If a respondent, named in an order issued under this section after a hearing, has not been served personally with the order
 but has received actual notice of the existence and substance of the order through personal appearance in court to hear the terms of the order from the court, no additional proof of service is required for enforcement of the order.

(2) If the respondent named in a temporary restraining order is personally served with the order and notice of hearing with respect to a restraining order or protective order based on the temporary restraining order, but the respondent does not appear at the hearing, either personally or by an attorney, and the terms and conditions of the restraining order or protective order issued at the hearing are identical to the temporary restraining order, except for the duration of the order, then the restraining order or protective order issued at the hearing may be served on the respondent by first-class mail sent to the
 respondent at the most current address for the respondent that is available to the court.

(3) The Judicial Council form for temporary orders issued pursuant to this subdivision shall contain a statement in substantially the following form:

“If you have been personally served with a temporary restraining order and notice of hearing, but you do not appear at the hearing either in person or by a lawyer, and a restraining order that is the same as this temporary restraining order except for the expiration date is issued at the hearing, a copy of the order will be served on you by mail at the following address:

If that address is not correct or you wish to verify that the temporary restraining order was converted to a restraining order at the hearing without
 substantive change and to find out the
 duration of that order, contact the clerk of the court.”

(p) (1) Information on a protective order relating to elder or dependent adult abuse issued by a court pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the Department of Justice in accordance with either paragraph (2) or (3).

(2) The court shall order the petitioner or the attorney for the petitioner to deliver a copy of an order issued under this section, or a reissuance, extension, modification, or termination of the order, and any subsequent proof of service, by the close of the business day on which the order, reissuance, extension, modification, or termination was made, to each law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner, and to any additional
 law enforcement agencies within the court’s discretion as are requested by the petitioner.

(3) Alternatively, the court or its designee shall transmit, within one business day, to law enforcement personnel all information required under subdivision (b) of Section 6380 of the Family Code regarding any order issued under this section, or a reissuance, extension, modification, or termination of the order, and any subsequent proof of service, by either one of the following methods:

(A) Transmitting a physical copy of the order or proof of service to a local law enforcement agency authorized by the Department of Justice to enter orders into the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS).

(B) With the approval
 of the Department of Justice, entering the order or proof of service into CLETS directly.

(4) Each appropriate law enforcement agency shall make available information as to the existence and current status of these orders to law enforcement officers responding to the scene of reported abuse.

(5) An order issued under this section shall, on request of the petitioner, be served on the respondent, whether or not the respondent has been taken into custody, by any law enforcement officer who is present at the scene of reported abuse involving the parties to the proceeding. The petitioner shall provide the officer with an endorsed copy of the order and a proof of service, which the officer shall complete and send to the issuing court.

(6) Upon receiving information at the scene of an incident of abuse that a protective order has been issued under this section, or that a person who has been taken into custody is the respondent to that order, if the protected person cannot produce an endorsed copy of the order, a law enforcement officer shall immediately attempt to verify the existence of the order.

(7) If the law enforcement officer determines that a protective order has been issued but not served, the officer shall immediately notify the respondent of the terms of the order and where a written copy of the order can be obtained, and the officer shall at that time also enforce the order. The law enforcement officer’s oral notice of the terms of the order shall constitute service of the order and is sufficient notice for the purposes of this section and for the purposes
 of Section 273.6 of the Penal Code.

(8) This subdivision does not apply, and the protective order shall not be subject to the requirements of Section 6380 of the Family Code, if the protective order issued pursuant to this section was made solely on the basis of isolation unaccompanied by force, threat, harassment, intimidation, or any other form of abuse.

(q) This section does not preclude either party from representation by private counsel or from appearing on the party’s own behalf.

(r) (1) There shall not be a filing fee for a petition, response, or paper seeking the reissuance, modification, or enforcement of a protective order filed in a proceeding brought pursuant to this section.

(2) (A) Commencing January 1, 2027, a court that receives petitions for protective orders under this section shall permit those petitions and any filings related to those petitions to be submitted electronically at no charge to the petitioner. The court shall, based on the time of the receipt, act on those filings consistent with subdivision (e).

(B) The request, notice of the court date, copies of the request to serve on the respondent, and the temporary restraining order, if granted, shall be provided to a petitioner who filed the petition electronically, unless the petitioner notes, at the time of
 electronic filing, that these documents will be picked up from the court.

(s) Pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 6103.2 of the Government Code, a petitioner shall not be required to pay a fee for law enforcement to serve an order issued under this section.

(t) The prevailing party in an action brought under this section may be awarded court costs and attorney’s fees, if any.

(u) (1) A person subject to a protective order under this section shall not own, possess, purchase, receive, or attempt to receive a firearm or ammunition while the protective order is in effect.

(2) The court shall order a person subject to a protective